Nevada, session 83, SB475.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of State Parks of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources for the replacement of
computers and information technology equipment and the repair and
replacement of radios the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $113,586
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $122,560
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of State Parks of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources for improvement and
deferred maintenance projects the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,500,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,500,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of State Parks of the State Department
of Conservation and Natural Resources for the purchase of computer
hardware and associated software, furniture, vehicles and law
enforcement equipment for new ranger positions the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $517,965
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $31,987
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of State Parks of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $5,550,554 for the
replacement of vehicles.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of State Parks of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $1,367,377 for the
replacement of utility vehicles, excavators and tractors.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of State Parks of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $24,780 for the
replacement of diagnostic automotive equipment.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of State Parks of the State Department of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $91,229 for the
replacement of mowers and small field equipment.
Sec. 8. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 4 to 7, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 9. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)